Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB297.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 160.041 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When a board of education of a[an independent] school district desires to have its
district merge with[become] a contiguous[part of the county] school district, it shall
by motion so record its desire in the minutes of the board. The board, or its
executive officer, shall convey this request to the[ county] board of education of the
contiguous school district. At its next regular meeting, or at a special meeting held
prior thereto, the[ county] board of education of the contiguous school district shall
consider the[pass upon this] request.
(2) (a) If the[ county] board of education receiving the request refuses, or the two (2)
boards of education cannot agree upon such a proposition of merger[ of the
independent district with the county district], the question of merger shall be
submitted to the qualified voters of the two (2) districts at the next regular
election if the question is filed with the county clerk not later than the second
Tuesday in August preceding the regular election.
(b)[(a)] If a majority of those voting on the question from each respective
school district favor merger, the school boards of the two (2) school districts
shall jointly develop a plan for adoption of the merger.
(c)[(b)] If the two (2) school boards cannot agree to the terms of merger within
sixty (60) days following the date of the regular election, the chief state school
officer shall develop the terms of the adoption of merger.
[(c) Notwithstanding subsection (2)(a) of this section, if the independent school
district cannot meet its current operating expenses from projected revenue and
if the two (2) school boards cannot agree to the terms of a merger, the
proposition of merger shall be submitted to the Kentucky Board of Education,
and the Kentucky Board of Education shall determine whether the two (2)
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/3/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 952
districts should be merged and if merged the terms thereto.]
(d) Upon completion of the plan for adoption of the merger, whether prepared by
the school boards or the chief state school officer[superintendent], it shall
become effective and the districts[independent district] shall merge[become a
part of the county school district] as set out in the plan.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, if a school district cannot meet its
current operating expenses from projected revenue and cannot negotiate a
merger with a contiguous school district, the Kentucky Board of Education shall
direct the merger of the insolvent school district with a contiguous district and
determine the terms of the merger.
(4) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish procedures and terms for the
merging of school districts due to insolvency under this section.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/3/2025 3:50 PM Jacketed